Utah statutes.
26-21-208.   Application for clearance by individuals.

(1)  An individual may apply for clearance by submitting to the department an application, including:

(a)  the personal identification information specified by the department under Subsection 26-21-204(4)(b); and

(b)  any fees established by the department under Subsection 26-21-204(9).

(2)  Clearance granted to an individual who makes application under Subsection (1) is valid for two years unless the department determines otherwise based on its ongoing review under Subsection 26-21-204(4)(a).



Enacted by Chapter 328, 2012 General Session

